California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
Employers whose employees are participating in an approved voluntary plan and any insurer of an approved plan shall furnish such reports and information and make available to the department such records as the director may by authorized regulations require for the proper administration of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

3268.

The Director of Employment Development shall, in accordance with his authorized regulations, promptly furnish to employers, employees, or insurers, such information as may be required for the proper administration of an approved voluntary plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1212, Sec. 292.)
-------------------------------------------

3269.

The director shall in accordance with his or her authorized regulations, determine each fiscal year the total amount expended for added administrative work arising out of voluntary plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 633.)
-------------------------------------------

3270.

The provisions of subdivision (i) of Section 3254 and subdivision (i) of Section 3255, dealing with substantial selection of risks adverse to the Disability Fund, shall be operative as of January 1, 1962.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1725.)
-------------------------------------------

3271.

(a) The director shall approve any amendment to a voluntary plan adjusting the provisions thereof as to periods after the effective date of the amendment as to which he or she finds that the plan, as amended, will conform to the standards set forth in Section 3254, and that any of the following exist:

(1) A majority of the employees covered by the plan have consented in writing to the amendment.

(2) All of the employees covered by the plan who are adversely affected by the amendment have consented in writing to the amendment.

(3) The insurer of such plan, if any, has certified to the director that notice of the amendment either separately or as a part of a new certificate or statement of coverage, has, at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the proposed amendment, been delivered to the employer for distribution to his or her employees within 10 days thereafter and has further certified that such notice specifically included notification to the employees covered by the plan of their right to withdraw from the plan.

(b) Nothing contained in this section is intended to deny or limit the right of the director to make regulations supplementary thereto, nor on the general subject of requirements for amendments of voluntary plans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 941.)
-------------------------------------------

3272.

The provisions of Article 9 (commencing with Section 1176) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of this division shall apply to amounts collected under Sections 3252, 3260, and 3265, to amounts remitted to the Disability Fund under Section 3260, and to amounts paid to an employee by an employer or insurer after a final decision on appeal under Section 3264 to an administrative law judge or the appeals board that the employee is entitled to disability benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Paid Family Leave [3300. - 3308.]

3300.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) It is in the public benefit to provide family temporary disability insurance benefits to workers to care for their family members. The need for family temporary disability insurance benefits has intensified as the participation of both parents in the workforce has increased, and the number of single parents in the workforce has grown. The need for partial wage replacement for workers taking family care leave will be exacerbated as the population of those needing care, both children and parents of workers, increases in relation to the number of working age adults.

(b) Family Temporary Disability Insurance shall be known as Paid Family Leave.

(c) Developing systems that help families adapt to the competing interests of work and home not only benefits workers, but also benefits employers by increasing worker productivity and reducing employee turnover.

(d) The federal Family and Medical Leave Act (FMLA) and California’s Family Rights Act (CFRA) entitle eligible employees working for covered employers to take unpaid, job-protected leave for up to 12 workweeks in a 12-month period. Under the FMLA and the CFRA, unpaid leave may be taken for the birth, adoption, or foster placement of a new child; to care for a seriously ill child, parent, or spouse; or for the employee’s own serious
 health condition.

(e) State disability insurance benefits currently provide wage replacement for workers who need time off due to their own nonwork-related injuries, illnesses, or conditions, including pregnancy, that prevent them from working, but do not cover leave to care for a sick or injured child, spouse, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, or domestic partner, or leave to bond with a new child.

(f) The majority of workers in this state are unable to take family care leave because they are unable to afford leave without pay. When workers do not receive some form of wage replacement during family care leave, families suffer from the worker’s loss of income, increasing the demand on the state unemployment insurance system and dependence on the state’s welfare
 system.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature to create a family temporary disability insurance program to help reconcile the demands of work and family. The family temporary disability insurance program shall be a component of the state’s unemployment compensation disability insurance program, shall be funded through employee contributions, and shall be administered in accordance with the policies of the state disability insurance program created pursuant to this part. Initial and ongoing administrative costs associated with the family temporary disability insurance program shall be payable from the Disability Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 350, Sec. 3.   (SB 770)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3301.

(a) (1) The purpose of this chapter is to establish, within the state disability insurance program, a family temporary disability insurance program. Family temporary disability insurance shall provide up to eight weeks of wage replacement benefits to workers who take time off work to care for a seriously ill child, spouse, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, or domestic partner, to bond with a minor child within one year of the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or to participate in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abridge the rights and responsibilities conveyed under the California Family Rights Act or pregnancy disability leave.

(b) (1) An individual’s “weekly benefit amount” for periods of disability commencing before January 1, 2025, shall be the amount provided in Section 2655, and for periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025, shall be the amount provided in paragraph (2). An individual is eligible to receive family temporary disability insurance benefits equal to one-seventh of the individual’s weekly benefit amount for each
 full day during which the individual is unable to work due to caring for a seriously ill or injured family member, bonding with a minor child within one year of the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) For periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025, the weekly benefit amount shall be as follows:

(A) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is less than seven hundred twenty-two
 dollars and fifty cents ($722.50), then fifty dollars ($50).

(B) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is more than 70 percent of the state average quarterly wage, the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to the greater of 70 percent of the wages paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code, or 63 percent of the state average weekly wage.

(C) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is seven hundred twenty-two dollars and fifty cents ($722.50) or more, but 70 percent or less than the state average quarterly wage, then the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to 90 percent of the wages paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “state average weekly wage” and “state average
 quarterly wage” have the same meanings as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 2655.

(c) The maximum amount payable to an individual during any disability benefit period for family temporary disability insurance shall be eight times the individual’s “weekly benefit amount,” but in no case shall the total amount of benefits payable be more than the total wages paid to the individual during the individual’s disability base period. If the benefit is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(d) No more than eight weeks of family temporary disability insurance benefits shall be paid within any 12-month period.

(e) An individual shall file a claim for family temporary disability
 insurance benefits not later than the 41st consecutive day following the first compensable day with respect to which the claim is made for benefits, which time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause. If a first claim is not complete, the claim form shall be returned to the claimant for completion and it shall be completed and returned not later than the 10th consecutive day after the date it was mailed by the department to the claimant, except that such time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until Section 3301.5 is incorporated in the Employment Development Department’s integrated claims management system as part of the EDDNext project, and as of that date is repealed.

(g) This
 section shall remain in effect only until July 1,
 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 772, Sec. 1.   (SB 590)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally repealed on or before July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 772.)
-------------------------------------------

3301.

(a) (1) The purpose of this chapter is to establish, within the state disability insurance program, a family temporary disability insurance program. Family temporary disability insurance shall provide up to eight weeks of wage replacement benefits to workers who take time off work to care for a seriously ill child, spouse, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, domestic partner, or designated person, to bond with a minor child within one year of the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or to participate in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of
 the United States.

(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abridge the rights and responsibilities conveyed under the California Family Rights Act or pregnancy disability leave.

(b) (1) An individual’s “weekly benefit amount” for periods of disability commencing before January 1, 2025, shall be the amount provided in Section 2655, and for periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025, shall be the amount provided in paragraph (2). An individual is eligible to receive family temporary disability insurance benefits equal to one-seventh of the individual’s weekly benefit
 amount for each full day during which the individual is unable to work due to caring for a seriously ill or injured family member, bonding with a minor child within one year of the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) For periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025, the weekly benefit amount shall be as follows:

(A) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is less than seven hundred
 twenty-two dollars and fifty cents ($722.50), then fifty dollars ($50).

(B) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is more than 70 percent of the state average quarterly wage, the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to the greater of 70 percent of the wages paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code, or 63 percent of the state average weekly wage.

(C) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is seven hundred twenty-two dollars and fifty cents ($722.50) or more, but 70 percent or less than the state average quarterly wage, then the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to 90 percent of the wages
 paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “state average weekly wage” and “state average quarterly wage” have the same meanings as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 2655.

(c) The maximum amount payable to an individual during any disability benefit period for family temporary disability insurance shall be eight times the individual’s “weekly benefit amount,” but in no case shall the total amount of benefits
 payable be more than the total wages paid to the individual during the individual’s disability base period. If the benefit is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(d) No more than eight weeks of family temporary disability insurance benefits shall be paid within any 12-month period.

(e) An individual shall file a claim for family temporary disability insurance benefits not later than the 41st consecutive day following the first compensable day with respect to which the claim is made for benefits, which time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause. If a first claim is not complete, the claim form shall be returned to the claimant for completion and it shall be completed and returned not
 later than the 10th consecutive day after the date it was mailed by the department to the claimant, except that such time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until Section 3301.5 is incorporated in the Employment Development Department’s integrated claims management system as part of the EDDNext project, and as of that date is repealed.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 772, Sec. 2.   (SB 590)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Conditionally operative on or before July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Conditionally repealed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3301.5.

(a) (1) The purpose of this chapter is to establish, within the state disability insurance program, a family temporary disability insurance program. Family temporary disability insurance shall provide up to eight weeks of wage replacement benefits to workers who take time off work to care for a seriously ill child, spouse, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, or domestic partner, to bond with a minor child within one year of the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or to participate in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered
 active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to abridge the rights and responsibilities conveyed under the California Family Rights Act or pregnancy disability leave.

(b) (1) An individual’s “weekly benefit amount” for periods of disability commencing before January 1, 2025, shall be the amount provided in Section 2655, and for periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025, shall be the amount provided in paragraph (2). An individual is eligible to receive family temporary disability insurance benefits equal to one-seventh of the individual’s weekly benefit amount for each full day during which the individual is unable to work
 due to caring for a seriously ill or injured family member, bonding with a minor child within one year of the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or participating in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(2) For periods of disability commencing on or after January 1, 2025, the weekly benefit amount shall be as follows:

(A) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is less than seven hundred twenty-two dollars and fifty cents ($722.50), then fifty dollars
 ($50).

(B) When the amount of wages paid to the individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is more than 70 percent of the state average quarterly wage, the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to the greater of 70 percent of the wages paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code, or 63 percent of the state average weekly wage.

(C) When the amount of wages paid to the
 individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest is seven hundred twenty-two dollars and fifty cents ($722.50) or more, but 70 percent or less than the state average quarterly wage, then the weekly benefit amount shall be equal to 90 percent of the wages paid to an individual for employment by employers during the quarter of the individual’s disability base period in which these wages were highest, divided by 13, but not exceeding the maximum workers’ compensation temporary disability indemnity weekly benefit amount established by the Department of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 4453 of the Labor Code.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “state average weekly wage” and “state average quarterly wage” have the same meanings as defined in
 subdivision (g) of Section 2655.

(c) The maximum amount payable to an individual during any disability benefit period for family temporary disability insurance shall be eight times the individual’s “weekly benefit amount,” but in no case shall the total amount of benefits payable be more than the total wages paid to the individual during the individual’s disability base period. If the benefit is not a multiple of one dollar ($1), it shall be computed to the next higher multiple of one dollar ($1).

(d) No more than eight weeks of family temporary disability insurance benefits shall be paid within any 12-month period.

(e) An individual may initiate
 the claims process up to 30 days in advance of the anticipated first compensable day. An individual shall file a claim for family temporary disability insurance benefits not later than the 41st consecutive day following the first compensable day with respect to which the claim is made for benefits, which time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause. If a first claim is not complete, the claim form shall be returned to the claimant for completion and it shall be completed and returned not later than the 10th consecutive day after the date it was mailed by the department to the
 claimant, except that the time shall be extended by the department upon a showing of good cause.

(f) This section shall become operative when incorporated in the Employment Development Department’s integrated claims management system as part of the EDDNext project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 876, Sec. 6.   (SB 1090)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3302.

On and after July 1, 2014, for purposes of this part:

(a) “Care recipient” means the family member who is receiving care for a serious health condition or the new child with whom the care provider is bonding. For the purposes of a qualifying exigency as set forth in Section 3302.2, “care recipient” also includes the military member, or child or parent of the military member, who is receiving assistance, or the employee who is participating in a qualifying exigency.

(b) “Care provider” means the family member who is providing the required care for a serious health condition; the family member who is bonding with the new child; or the employee who is participating
 in a qualifying exigency as provided in Section 3302.2.

(c) “Child” means a biological, adopted, or foster son or daughter, a stepson or stepdaughter, a legal ward, a son or daughter of a domestic partner, or the person to whom the employee stands in loco parentis.

(d) “Domestic partner” has the same meaning as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code.

(e) “Family care leave” means any of the following:

(1) Leave to bond with a minor child within the first year of the child’s birth or placement in connection with foster care or adoption.

(2) Leave to care for a child, parent, grandparent,
 grandchild, sibling, spouse, or domestic partner who has a serious health condition.

(3) Leave to participate in a qualifying exigency as provided in Section 3302.2.

(f) “Family member” means child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, or domestic partner as defined in this section.

(g) “Grandchild” means a child of the employee’s child.

(h) “Grandparent” means a parent of the employee’s parent.

(i) “Military member” means a child, spouse, domestic partner, or parent of the employee, where the military member is on covered active duty or call to active duty in the Armed Forces of
 the United States as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 3302.1.

(j) “Parent” means a biological, foster, or adoptive parent, a parent-in-law, a stepparent, a legal guardian, or other person who stood in loco parentis to the employee when the employee was a child.

(k) “Parent-in-law” means the parent of a spouse or a domestic partner.

(l) “Serious health condition” means an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition that involves inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential health care facility, or continuing treatment or continuing supervision by a health care provider, as defined in Section 12945.2 of the Government Code.

(m) “Sibling” means a person related to another person by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent.

(n) “Spouse” means a partner to a lawful marriage.

(o) “Valid claim” means any claim for family temporary disability insurance benefits made in accordance with the provisions of this code, and any rules and regulations adopted thereunder, if the individual claiming benefits is unemployed and has been paid the necessary wages in employment for employers to qualify for benefits under Section 2652 and is caring for a seriously ill family member, or bonding with a minor child during the first year after the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption.

(p) “Twelve-month period,” with respect to any individual, means the 365 consecutive days that begin with the first day the individual first establishes a valid claim for family temporary disability benefits.

(q) This section shall remain in effect only until July 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 772, Sec. 3.   (SB 590)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 4 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 772.)
-------------------------------------------

3302.

On and after July 1, 2028, for purposes of this part:

(a) “Care recipient” means the family member who is receiving care for a serious health condition or the new child with whom the care provider is bonding. For the purposes of a qualifying exigency as set forth in Section 3302.2, “care recipient” also includes the military member, or child or parent of the military member, who is receiving assistance, or the employee who is participating in a qualifying exigency.

(b) “Care provider” means the family member who is providing the required care for a serious health condition; the family member who is bonding with the new child; or the employee who is participating in a qualifying exigency as provided in Section 3302.2.

(c) “Child” means a biological, adopted, or foster son or daughter, a stepson or stepdaughter, a legal ward, a son or daughter of a domestic partner, or the person to whom the employee stands in loco parentis.

(d) “Designated person” means any care recipient related by blood or whose association with the
 individual is the equivalent of a family relationship.

(e) “Domestic partner” has the same meaning as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code.

(f) “Family care leave” means any of the following:

(1) Leave to bond with a minor child within the first year of the child’s birth or placement in connection with foster care or adoption.

(2) Leave to care for a child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, domestic partner, or designated person who has a serious health condition.

(3) Leave to participate in a qualifying exigency as provided in Section 3302.2.

(g) “Family member” means a child, parent, grandparent, grandchild, sibling, spouse, domestic partner, or designated person.

(h) “Grandchild” means a child of the employee’s child.

(i) “Grandparent” means a parent of the employee’s parent.

(j) “Military member” means a child, spouse, domestic partner, or parent of the employee, where the military member is on covered active duty or call to active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 3302.1.

(k) “Parent” means a biological, foster, or adoptive parent, a parent-in-law, a stepparent, a legal guardian, or other person
 who stood in loco parentis to the employee when the employee was a child.

(l) “Parent-in-law” means the parent of a spouse or a domestic partner.

(m) “Serious health condition” means an illness, injury, impairment, or physical or mental condition that involves inpatient care in a hospital, hospice, or residential health care facility, or continuing treatment or continuing supervision by a health care provider, as defined in Section 12945.2 of the Government Code.

(n) “Sibling” means a person related to another person by blood, adoption, or affinity through a common legal or biological parent.

(o) “Spouse” means a partner to a lawful marriage.

(p) “Valid claim” means any claim for family temporary disability insurance benefits made in accordance with the provisions of this code, and any rules and regulations adopted thereunder, if the individual claiming benefits is unemployed and has been paid the necessary wages in employment for employers to qualify for benefits under Section 2652 and is caring for a seriously ill family member, or bonding with a minor child during the first year after the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption.

(q) “Twelve-month period,” with respect to any individual, means the 365 consecutive days that begin with the first day the individual first establishes a valid claim for family temporary disability benefits.

(r) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 772, Sec. 4.   (SB 590)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3302.1.

(a) For purposes of this chapter:

(1) “Covered active duty” means, with respect to a member of the regular Armed Forces of the United States, duty during the deployment of the member with the regular armed forces to a foreign country and, with respect to a member of the reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States, duty during the deployment of the member of those reserve components to a foreign country under a federal call or order to active duty.

(2) “Disability benefit period” with respect to any individual, means the period of unemployment beginning with the first day an individual establishes a valid claim for family temporary disability insurance benefits to care for a seriously
 ill family member, to bond with a minor child during the first year after the birth or placement of the child in connection with foster care or adoption, or to participate in a qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(A) Periods of family care leave for the same care recipient within a 12-month period shall be considered one disability benefit period.

(B) Periods of disability for pregnancy, as defined in Section 2608, and periods of family care leave for bonding associated with the birth of that child shall be considered one disability benefit period.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 849, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 270.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative January 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3302.2.

For purposes of this chapter, a “qualifying exigency related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the individual’s spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States” means any of the following:

(a) Activities undertaken within seven calendar days from the date that a spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent has been notified of an impending call or order to covered active duty in the
 Armed Forces of the United States to address any issue that arises from the call or order.

(b) Attendance in either or both of the following:

(1) An official ceremony, program, or event sponsored by the military that is related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent.

(2) A family support or assistance program and informational briefing sponsored or promoted by the military, military service organizations, or the American Red Cross that is related to the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent.

(c) Any of the following activities related to the biological, adopted, or foster child,
 stepchild, legal ward, or child for whom the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States stands in loco parentis, who is either not more than 18 years of age or, if equal to or more than 18 years of age, is incapable of self-care because of a disability at the time that the paid leave is to commence:

(1) Arranging for alternative childcare for the child when the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the
 Armed Forces of the United States necessitates a change in the existing childcare arrangement.

(2) Providing childcare for the child on an urgent, immediate need basis when the need to provide this care arises from the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(3) Enrolling or transferring the child to a new school or day care facility when enrollment or transfer is necessitated by the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the
 Armed Forces of the United States.

(4) Attending meetings with staff at the child’s school or day care facility, including, but not limited to, meetings with school officials regarding disciplinary measures, parent-teacher conferences, or meetings with school counselors, when these meetings are necessary due to circumstances arising from the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces
 of the United States.

(d) To make financial and legal arrangements for either or both of the following purposes:

(1) Making or updating financial or legal arrangements to address the absence of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States while on covered active duty or call to covered active duty, including, but not limited to, preparing and executing financial and healthcare powers of attorney, transferring bank account signature authority, enrolling in the Defense Enrollment Eligibility Reporting System (DEERS), obtaining military identification cards, or preparing or updating a will or living trust.

(2) Acting as the representative of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States before a federal, state, or local agency for purposes of obtaining, arranging, or appealing military service benefits while the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States is on covered active duty or call to covered active duty, and for a period of ninety days following the termination of the covered active duty.

(e) Attending counseling provided by someone other than a health care provider, for oneself, for the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States, or for the biological, adopted, or foster child, a stepchild, or a legal ward of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States, or a child for whom this person stands in loco parentis, who is either not more than 18 years of age, or equal to or more than 18 years of age and incapable of self-care because of a disability at the time that paid family leave is to commence,
 provided that the need for counseling arises from the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(f) Accompanying a spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States while that individual is on short-term, temporary, rest and recuperation leave during the period of deployment in a foreign country, provided that any leave taken for this purpose is for not more than 15 calendar days beginning on the date of
 commencement for the rest and recuperation leave.

(g) Attending arrival ceremonies, reintegration briefings and events, and any other official ceremony or program sponsored by the military for a period of 90 days following the termination of the covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(h) Addressing issues that arise from the death of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the
 United States while on covered active duty status, including meeting and recovering the body of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States, making funeral arrangements, and attending funeral services.

(i) (1) Any of the following activities related to the parent of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States while the parent of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the armed forces during covered active duty is incapable
 of self-care by requiring active assistance or supervision over daily self-care in three or more of the activities of daily living or instrument activities of daily living:

(A) Arranging for alternative care for the parent of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States when the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States necessitates a change in the existing care arrangement for the parent.

(B) Providing care for the parent who is incapable of self-care on an urgent, immediate need basis when the need to provide this care arises from the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the
 Armed Forces of the United States.

(C) Admitting or transferring the parent to a care facility when admission or transfer is necessitated by the covered active duty or call to covered active duty of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the Armed Forces of the United States.

(D) Attending meetings with staff at the parent’s care facility, including, but not limited to, meetings with hospice or social service providers of the parent of the spouse, domestic partner, child, or parent in the